Mississippi, session 2026, HB326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  A state agency or department owning, leasing, administering or having supervision and managerial oversight over agricultural land shall solicit requests for proposals consistent with the best practices provided in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423 for the purpose of employing an accredited farm manager to assist such agency or department with applicable land investment analysis and management of the day-to-day operations of the property in order to optimize the value of the land.  The accredited farm manager employed by the agency or department shall provide professional management services including, but not limited to, financial analysis and accounting, crop and livestock production, commodity marketing and soil conservation.  The services provided to the agency or department by the accredited farm manager shall be in addition to the managerial operations relating to the agricultural land being performed by employees of that agency or department. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.